Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.700

Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The legislature has power to amend or repeal all or part of this chapter at any time, and all domestic and foreign entities subject to this chapter are governed by the amendment or repeal.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1701.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.